Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1427
Franchise; termination; noncontinuance; change community; additional dealership; application; hearing; burden of proof.

Upon hearing, the franchisor shall have the burden of proof to establish that under the Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act the franchisor should be granted permission to terminate or not continue the franchise, to change the franchisee's community, or to enter into a franchise establishing an additional motor vehicle, combination motor vehicle and trailer, motorcycle, or trailer dealership.

Nothing contained in the act shall be construed to require or authorize any investigation by the board of any matter before the board under the provisions of sections 60-1420 to 60-1435. Upon hearing, the board, or hearing officer employed by the board, shall hear the evidence introduced by the parties. The hearing officer employed by the board shall make a recommendation to the board solely upon the record so made. The board shall make its decision solely upon the record so made.

Laws 1971, LB 768, § 27;

Laws 1972, LB 1335, § 14;

Laws 2010, LB816, § 75;

Laws 2011, LB477, § 5;

Laws 2022, LB1148, § 5.

The auto manufacturer-franchisor carries the burden of proof to provide evidence sufficient to terminate an auto franchise. American Motors Sales Corp. v. Perkins, 198 Neb. 97, 251 N.W.2d 727 (1977).